Utah statutes.
76-8-601.   Wrongful commencement of action in justice court.

Any party to any suit or proceeding, and any attorney or agent for the party, who knowingly commences, prosecutes, or maintains any action, suit, or proceeding in any justice court other than as provided in Sections 78A-7-105 and 78A-7-106, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

